Massachusetts, session 194th, H3146.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 58 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:-
"Section 52. No new tax shall be collected, assessed or payable until 3 months after the
passage of the act in which the new tax was created."
of 1